Wisconsin, session 2025, AB762.
do enact as follows:AB762,11Section 1. 69.20 (3) (b) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB762,2,12269.20 (3) (b) 6. The information is from a birth record of a registrant born in 3this state whose birthing parent resided in this state at the time of birth and is 4submitted to the department of financial institutions for the purpose of 5administering s. 224.50 (3m). At a minimum, the state registrar shall disclose to 6the department of financial institutions for non-impounded records of newly 7registered births, at least every 6 months, the name of the child, the child’s date of 8birth, the birth record state file number, and the name and address of the parent 9who gave birth to the child, if the record is not flagged as a safe haven, surrogate 10birth, or intended or completed adoption, if the record is not flagged for “do not 11contact,” and if the child who is the subject of the record is not known to be 12deceased.AB762,213Section 2. 224.50 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB762,3,214224.50 (2) (a) Except as provided in s. 224.51, and subject to sub. (3m), 15establish and administer a college savings program that allows an individual, trust, 1legal guardian, or entity described under 26 USC 529 (e) (1) (C) to establish a 2college savings account for the purposes set forth in 26 USC 529.AB762,33Section 3. 224.50 (3) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB762,3,114224.50 (3) (bm) Beginning on August 1, 2015, no contribution may be made to 5an account if the contribution would cause the account balance of a beneficiary’s 6account, or the combined balance of all accounts of a beneficiary, to exceed 7$425,000. This contribution limitation applies to all accounts that are established 8on and after that date, and to all accounts that are in existence on that date that 9have not yet reached the balance limit specified in this paragraph, subject to the 10annual increase described in sub. (2) (i), except that this paragraph does not apply 11to an account established under sub. (3m) (b).AB762,412Section 4. 224.50 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB762,3,1313224.50 (3m) WisKids Savings Account Program. (a) In this subsection:AB762,3,14141. “Parent” means any of the following:AB762,3,1815a. A child’s parent as identified or updated in the child’s record of birth or a 16court’s adoption order relating to the child or as subsequently updated in the 17records of the department or in the system of vital records, as defined in s. 69.01 18(25) (a).AB762,3,2019b. A child’s parent as identified in a notice provided to the department under 20par. (c) 2. or 3.AB762,3,23212. “Program participant” means a child for whom the department has made a 22deposit under par. (c) 1. or 2. or established an account under par. (c) 3. and for 23whom the department maintains an accounting under par. (d).AB762,4,313. “Qualified higher education expenses” has the meaning given in 26 USC 2529 (e) (3) and includes the meaning under 26 USC 529 (c) (8) and (9) but excludes 3the meaning under 26 USC 529 (c) (7).AB762,4,104(b) The department shall establish a master holding account, and may 5establish interim holding accounts or additional accounts, under this section. The 6department may make transfers to the master holding account or an interim 7holding account for the purpose of meeting current and anticipated future 8obligations to make deposits under this subsection. The department may enter an 9agreement with the program vendor under s. 224.51 or one or more other financial 10institutions to maintain such accounts.AB762,4,1511(c) 1. Subject to subd. 5. and pars. (e), (f), and (m) 2., upon receiving notice 12that a child identified in a birth record provided under s. 69.20 (3) (b) 6. has been 13designated as a beneficiary of a college savings account established under sub. (2) 14(a) before the child has reached 10 years of age, the department shall deposit at 15least $25 into an account established under par. (b) for the child.AB762,4,22162. Subject to subd. 5. and pars. (e), (f), and (m) 2., if no deposit has been made 17for a child under subd. 1. and a parent of the child notifies the department and 18provides proof satisfactory to the department that the child was born or adopted in 19this state and resides in this state and has been designated as a beneficiary of a 20college savings account established under sub. (2) (a) before the child has reached 2110 years of age, the department shall deposit at least $25 into an account 22established under par. (b) for the child.AB762,5,3233. If no deposit has been made for a child under subd. 1. or 2. and a parent of 1the child notifies the department and provides proof satisfactory to the department 2that the child resides in this state, the department shall establish an account under 3par. (b) for the child.AB762,5,644. In addition to any deposit under subd. 1. or 2., and subject to subd. 5., the 5department may make deposits into accounts established under par. (b) in 6accordance with policies established by the board.AB762,5,975. The department shall make a deposit under subd. 1. or 2. only if funds are 8available. The department may not make deposits under subds. 1., 2., and 4. that, 9in total, exceed $2,000,000 in any calendar year.AB762,5,1110(d) For each account established under par. (b), the department shall 11maintain an accounting that includes the following information:AB762,5,13121. The name of each child for whom the department made a deposit under par. 13(c) 1. or 2. or established an account under par. (c) 3.AB762,5,14142. The name of each parent of the child under subd. 1.AB762,5,16153. The principal and earnings in the account established for the child under 16subd. 1.AB762,5,2017(e) 1. Before depositing money into an account established under par. (b) on 18behalf of a child described in par. (c) 1., the department shall provide written notice 19to the child’s parent identified in a birth record provided under s. 69.20 (3) (b) 6. 20The notice shall contain all of the following information:AB762,5,2221a. A description of the program under this subsection, including the amount 22the department will deposit into the account for the child.AB762,6,223b. That the parent may elect on behalf of the child not to participate in the 1program under this subsection and forgo the department’s deposit of money into the 2account.AB762,6,53c. That the department will consider the child to participate in the program 4under this subsection unless a parent of the child notifies the department within 30 5days of the date of the notice that the child opts out of the program.AB762,6,862. If a parent informs the department within 30 days of the date of the notice 7under subd. 1. that the child opts out of the program, the department may not 8include the child in the program under this subsection.AB762,6,129(f) If the department determines, based on available information, that a child 10described in par. (c) 1. or 2. and the child's parents were not residents of this state at 11the time of the child's birth or adoption, the department may not make the deposit 12under par. (c) 1. or 2. for the child.AB762,6,1713(g) If the department receives adoption information regarding a child for 14whom the department has already deposited money under par. (c) 1., the 15department shall update its records to designate each adoptive parent, and to 16remove each parent identified in the birth records, as the child’s parent for 17purposes of this subsection.AB762,6,2218(h) Upon request of a program participant, the department shall direct that a 19distribution from an account established under par. (b) be made on behalf of the 20program participant to a 3rd party, or to the college savings account established 21under sub. (2) (a) for which the program participant is designated as a beneficiary, 22if all of the following apply:AB762,7,211. The distribution is made to pay, in whole or in part, the program 2participant’s qualified higher education expenses.AB762,7,432. There are funds in the account established for the program participant 4available to pay the distribution under subd. 1.AB762,7,85(i) 1. The department may remove a program participant from the program 6and make the funds that had been deposited into an account established for the 7program participant available for use by other program participants if any of the 8following applies:AB762,7,139a. The department has not made any distribution under par. (h) for the 10program participant before the program participant attains 21 years of age or has 11not distributed all funds deposited into the account established for the program 12participant within 2 years of the department’s first distribution for the program 13participant.AB762,7,1414b. The program participant dies.AB762,7,1715c. The program participant, or a parent of the program participant, notifies 16the department in writing that the program participant is discontinuing 17participation in the program.AB762,7,2218(j) The department may accept contributions to the program from any person 19on behalf of program participants. These contributions to the program are subject 20to par. (L) and are not amounts paid into a college savings account for purposes of s. 2171.05 (6) (b) 32. These contributions are irrevocable after the department deposits 22the contributed funds into an account established under par. (b). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab762 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab762 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB762 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB762 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB762: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting